District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.148

Use of certified mail.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 148
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 86-106, § 17
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.148.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.48.
1973 Ed., § 29-957.